hyph_be_BY@tarask.dic
UTF-8
.аас3
.аба4ру
.аба3т4
.аб3лу
.аб3р
.аб'3
.аг4лы
.ада3ж4
.ада4ра
.ада4ру
.ада3т4
.ад3ах3
.ад3ж
.ад3зь
.адо2
.ад3ру
.ад3ры
.ад3рэ
.ае2
.аж4
.аз2
.аз4в
.азо3р
.азь4
.аі4
.ак3ва
.ак4сал
.ал3г
.ал4ма.
.амаг3
.ам4шу
.ана4г3
.ан4ту
.ао2
.ап4лял
.арта4г
.арэ3а
.арэа4г
.ас4
.асае3
.ас3пэ
.ас3тэ
.ась3п
.ась4ця
.атас3
.ат4ру
.ат4ры.
.ат4рыц
.ау4
.аў3л
.аўта3
.ач4
.аш4к
.аш4чан
.баб3р
.ба4гн
.ба4г3р
.бак3л
.ба3ра
.барас4
.ба4р3в
.бас3к
.бела3
.бі2я
.бу3ча
.ваг3р
.ві3я
.во2е
.вык4
.да3гу
.да3ж4н
.даз4
.да3р4ч
.да3с
.дас4н
.да3тл
.да3х
.да3шу
.дж2
.дзь4
.дна2
.дра4пр
.ды3ё
.ды3яг
.ды3яс3
.ды3ят
.дэ3кв
.ез3д
.за3ж
.за3з
.за3ль4
.за3рв
.заў3л
.за3ф
.за3ц4
.за3ч4
.звыш3
.зд4
.зоа3
.зь4
.зье3х
.іг3р
.іё4
.іпа4с
.іў3
.ія4
.ка4п3р
.кас3л
.кра4ск
.кш4
.к'2
.ла4ў
.ле4п3р
.лжэ3
.ліў3
.ль4
.мас3т
.мат3р
.мах3р
.мг4
.наг4р
.на4дж
.на3ж4
.на3зм
.най3
.на3л
.наль4
.нап4
.на1с
.нас4к
.на3с4н
.нась4
.на3т
.на4ў
.на3ц4к
.на3ш4
.ная4
.не3з
.не3к
.не3л
.не1с
.несь4
.нія4
.ня3з
.ня3п
.ня3с4
.ня3т
.ня3ц
.ня3ш
.от3р
.падзь4
.па3ж4
.пак4л
.палуд4
.пань4
.па3р4в
.па3рж
.па3сн
.пась4ц
.па3т4к
.па3ц4
.по3мс
.пос4ту
.пра3т
.прыя4е4
.прыя4л
.прыя4ю
.пс4
.раб3р
.ра3да
.ра3ду
.ра4зал
.раз3в
.раз3д
.ра4зе
.ра4з3о4
.ра4кл
.рас3к
.рас3т
.рась3
.ра4ў
.ра4ш3п
.ро4с
.роса4
.рос3і4
.ры4зн
.рых3
.рэ1а
.рэ3а4с3
.рэ4о
.сае4
.са3ж4
.са3мл
.санан4
.са3т4
.са3ч4
.ск4
.сп4
.спана4
.ст2
.ста3с
.су3кв
.сь4
.та4п3л
.траш3
.тыг3р
.тэх1
.уа2
.уб4
.уг4
.удак3
.уд4н
.уж4
.уза3ч4
.ук4
.уль2
.уль4ч
.ум4
.ун2д
.уп4
.ур4в
.ус4л
.ус2т
.ус4тае
.ус4тац
.ус4тын
.ут4
.ух4
.уш2
.уш4ч
.ую4
.уя4
.ўд4
.ўдак3
.ўж4
.ўм4
.ўп4
.ўс4
.ўт4
.ўш4
.ўю3чы
.ць4
.чап3р
.эа4
.эо4
.яб3
.яд3р
.яс4к
.яць3
2а1а4
ааб1р
а3ад
аа3да
аад3ж
аад3зі
аадо2
аад3ор
аад3р
а3аз
а3ан
а3ар
аас4
аас2н
аах3в
ааш3ч
аба3бр
аба3б'
абаг4
аба3гн
аба3ж4
аба4рац
абас3т
2абат
3абедз
абі3як
а3блы
а3бо
а3б4род
а3брыд
а3брые
а3брэх
аб3ск
аб1у4ч
аб3ш
аваа3ч
ава3бр
ава1з4
ава3т
ава3ф
авык4
а3вэ
ага3з
агал4
ага3п
а3г4в
3а4гент
3а4генц
а4гіту
аг4ліц
аг4нес
аг4нецц
аг4ну
а3гнут
а3гню
а3гня
агня3ц
а3грав
аг3рал
аграф4к
2ада
а3да.
а4да4бар
а4дабр
а3дав
а3дага
а3дадз
а2даз4
а3дай
а3дак
а4да4ко
а2дап
а3дапа
ада4пе
а3дапі
ада4пр
ад3а4пы
а3дапя
а3дара
ад3асе
ад3асо
а3даст
а3даў
а3дах
а2даш
ад3ашу
а3дашы
а3даю
ад3вар
а4дзем
а3дзьв
а3дзьм
ад4нец
ад4нюю
а3драі
а3драй
ад3рак
ад4рал
ад4рана
ад4ранк
ад4рану
ад4раны
а3драп
а3драў
а3дрын
ад3ула
а3дыб
а2дыд
адыё3д
а3дымн
а4дынс
а4дысп
а3дыха
а4дыхо
а3дыя
ады4яна
ад'я2
а1е
а3ева
а2еву
ае4ды
ае4ж
а3е4к
ае4л
ае4м
аема3
ае1ра
ае4т
ае3ўп
ае2х
а3е2ч
а1ё
аё4к
а3ёл
аё4ме
а1ж
аж2р
аза4гіт
аза4дз
азад4н
азаз3д
а3зак
а3зал
аза3мн
аза4рал
аза4ран
аза4рац
аза4ро
аза4руц
аза4рыл
аза4рыў
аза4рыц
аз3бр
аз3бу
аз3вор
азвые4
аз1д
аз4дар
аз3др
а1зе
а1зё
3азёр
а1зі
азі3к
азо2р
аз3рад
аз1ук
а3зум
а2зу2ю2
азь3
а3зьзя
а4зьн
азь4нят
а4зыс
а1зю
а1зя
а3і2
аіг3
аі3т
аія4
айк4
ай3кн
ай3с4м
ай3сь
а3ка
акавы4т
ака3г
ака3кр
акапе3
ака4ў
а3к4к
а3кл
ак3лер
ак3ліс
а4кляз
ак3ляр
ак4ляў
а3ком
а3коў
ак4ра.
ак3раб
ак4рав
ак4ру
ак4ры.
ак4рыс
ак3рэд
ак4сэн
3актов
ак3т4ро
а3ла
алаа3ч
алах3в
ал3ган
2а3лё
алёг3р
ал4жэ
алі3г
3алімп
а3лін
аліп3л
алі3ям
алома3
а3лу
аль3в
а3лье.
аль3н
аль4пам
аль4паў
аль4пах
а3льяц
а3ля
аля4тр
амаг3л
амап4
амг4
а3мі.
амі3як
ам4леў
ам4лец
ам4не
а3мнё
ам4ні.
ам4ніце
а3мно
а3м2ня
амо4гр
ам3п4ля
амсь3
ам2ч
ам4чу.
ам4шац
ам4шыл
ам4шым
ам4шыў
ам4шыц
ам4шыш
а3мшэ
ана4зь
а4накс
анан4та
анан4ту
ана4пл
ана4раб
ана3тв
ана4тры
ана4хр
ан3дж
а4нуч
а4нь
ан1эп
аняс4
а1о
ао4г
а2ол
апа3ж4
апа4кла
апа3рж
апа4с3л
апас4н
апа4сп
апа4стэ
2апат
апаш3л
апа4ш3ч
2а3піт
а4плем
а3плеў
а3плё
ап4лі
а3пляз
апо4дый
апо3мс
апона3
апонач4
апо3нн
ап4рам
а3пру
а3прэ
ап3рэт
ап4с
апст4
а3псы
1апэр
а1ра
ара3гр
ара3др
арае3д
араж3н
араз3в
арана4с
ара3с4ц
арась3
араў4ла
араф3р
а3рах
а3р2ву
ароса4м
арт3р
а1ру
ар4чат
а1ры
ары4зн
а3рып
арэо2
а2с2в
а4скан
а4склі
ас3кля
а3скн
ас3кос
ас3коц
а1сл
ас4лу.
асма4гр
ас4май
ас4нав
а4снаг
а4снае
а4снай
а4снам
а4снаю
а4сная
а4сны
2асп4
ас3пл
ас4пэ
ас2т
ас3тап
аста4пр
а4стах
ас3таю
а3с4тол
аст4п
ас3тур
а3стыв
ас4тыл
ас4тын
а2суг
2асфэ
а4сха
ас3хв
ас3хем
ась3пё
а4сьці.
1асяр
а1т
ат3абл
ат3абя
а3тай
а3тал
3атамн
а3тан
ата4пр
ат3а4пэ
атас4т
ата4сь
а3таў
а3таю
ат2в
ат3вал
ат4кае
ат4ла.
ат4леў
ат4лею
ат2лё
ат4ляв
а3то
ато3ра
ат3рад
а3траі
а3трап
а3трат
а3траў
ат4раю
а3трое
а3троі
а3трой
а3тром
ат3рош
а3труб
ат3руг
ат4рус
а3трух
ат3рыб
а3трыв
а3трыз
ат3рык
ат4рыце
ат3рыя
ат3ск
а3тчэ
2атэ
ат3этн
а1у
аў2ва
аў2гр
а1ўдо
а3ўзг
аўзь3н
аў3і
аўст3р
а1ўсх
аўт4в
аўт3н
а4факт
афата4
аф4кай
аф4камі
аф4каю
аф4ку
аф2лю
аф2р
а3фтон
2а3фэ
а1х
4ах.
а2х3а4г
а4хві
2ахім
а3хлёр
а3хло
ах4лы
а3хны
а2х3уз
а3це
аці3сл
а1цм
ача3е
ача3пр
а3чм
ач4ніс
ач2ня
а1ш2
а3швэ
а4шка
а4ш3кі
аш3ла
а3шну
а3шпі
а3штэ
а4шча.
аш3чад
а4ш3чал
а4шчыц
а4шчэл
аш4ш
а1э4
2аэк
аэра1
аэрас4
аю4з
аю4ру
аю2ры
а1я
а3ява
ая2ві
ая3вы
а3я2г
а3я2д
ая4дз
ая4ды
а3яем
а3яец
а3яеш
а3язь
ая2к
ая3ком
ая3ку
ая2р
ая3ра
ая3ры
ая4сі
а3ях
а3яюц
1б
3ба
баб3ро
баб3ры
баб4с
ба3г4л
ба3гну
ба4гро
б1а2гу
ба1дж
ба3дзь
бад4не
бад2р
ба1з2
баз4в
ба3зу
б4ак
ба4кл
ба3кр
ба3ль4л
ба3м4л
ба3м4н
ба3мр
ба3мш
ба3п4н
ба4рал
ба4раўш
бар4вал
бар4ван
бар4ваў
бар4вац
баро4г
ба4руц
ба4рэ.
ба4рэш
бас2
ба3с4кр
ба2с3м
бас4п
ба3с4с
ба2ст
ба1сх
ба4сь
ба3тв
бат1р
бат4ру
бат4ры
батыг3
ба3ўкл
ба3ўла
ба3ўтв
ба3фр
бах3в
ба4ш3лё
ба2шм
ба4шн
ба3яв
ба4я3зд
б3б2
2б3в
бвы4
2б3г4
2бґ
2б3д2
бда2с
бдзь4
3бе
бе3да
бе3дз
бед3р
бе4з
без1а4
без3д
без1у
бе1р
бера4с
бес3к
бес3п
бес3т
бес3ц
бесь3
3бё
2б1ж
2б1з4
3бі
бі2ён
бі3кв
бі3п
бі2яд
бія3с
2б3к
бкак3
б4кв
бк3ва
2бл
благае4
благай4
благаю4
благ3р
бла4зн
бла4ст
4б3ле
б2лёк
бліца4м
4б3ліч
б4ліш
б2лош
б2луд
б2лы
4блы.
б3лыг
4блым
б3лыс
4блых
4блыя
3б2ляс
2бм
2б3н
бна3т
бод2в
бо3ек
3бож
3бой
3бом
3борд
3боц
3боя
4б3п4
2бр2
б1раб
б1рав
бра3г
б1рад
б1раж
бра3за
б1раі
бра4кл
б3рало
б1рам
б1рас
бра4с3л
б3ратв
б3ратл
4б3рахі
б1рач
бра4ш3п
б2ров
бро4мац
б1руб
3бруд
3брук
б1рус
б1руч
4бры.
б3рына
б3рынн
б1рыс
3брыт
б3рых
б3рыце
б1рыч
б3рэг
б2рэш
2б1с2
б4скі
бс4т
б2ств
бст2р
3бсты
бс3ц
2б3т2
б4т3в
3буб
бу3зя
3бук
бук3л
б1ум
3бур
бус3л
4буў
3бух
буць3
бу2ч
бу4чэ
3буя
2бф
2б3х4
2б3ц
бцы3ям
2б1ч
2б1ш4
б3шл
б3шн
3бы.
быг3
был3г
4бын
быст1
быя4
3бэ
бэр2э
3б2ю1
бя2з
бяз3д
бяз3л
бяс3к
бяс3п
бясь3
2б'
б'2ём
б'я4в
4б'яд
3б'яц
1в2
ваап3р
ва3г4
ва4гра
ва3да3
ва4др
3вае
ваз2
ва2зб
ва1зв
вазі3с
ва1зл
вазь4л
вазь4м
3вай
вака3п
ва3кр
вал3г
4валіф
валь4лю
ва3лья
вам4
ва3мл
ва3мн
4вамп
ва3мч
3вапа
ва3пля
ва3ра
вараз4
2варш
вас3ко
ва3скр
ва1с4с
вас3та
вас4т3р
ва2сь
ва4сь3м
ва3сь4п
ва3сь4с
ват1р
3ваты
3ваў
ва3ў2в
ва3ўт
ва3ўх
ваф2
вах3в
3вацк
ва4шн
ваш3чы
3ваю
вая3к
ве3да
ве4дап
3ведж
ве3дз
3ведзі
3ведн
ве3ду.
3вее
ве4к3р
3вела
3велі.
3велу
3велы
3венк
3венс
3вены
ве2п
ве1ра
вера4сь
вера4ш3
3верт
3веск
вес3л
3веў
3вею
вёк3
3вёра
3вёрк
3вёрт
вё2х3
відэа3
ві3ёл
ві3ём
3віру
3віск
3віч
ві1ял
ві2яр
вія3с
вія3т
ві3яф
2віяц
2в3л
3во.
3вожа
во3кл
вок3р
3вом
3воп4
во4прам
2ворс
4вор'е
4вор'і
4вор'ю
3вот
3воч
во2яў
вуг3р
вук3р
вуп3
вы3
выг4
выж4
вый3
вык4в
вы4ль
выль4л
вым4
вып4
выр4в
выс4
выст4
высь2
выт2
выт4н
выт4р
выф2
вых4
выц4
выць4
выч2
выш2
вы4шв
выш4т
выю4
выя4
вэ3а
4вэц
вю2х1
4вяг
3вяе
вя3зы
вяк3р
3вяна
3вяны
вя2п3
3вярц
3вяск
вя3тв
вя4т3л
вят3р
3вяю
1г2
г4а
габ3р
га3г
га4гры
га3зб
га1зн
га3зу
газь4
га3зьб
гай2г3
га3кв
га4ль
3ганк
гара4н
га4рана
гарас3
гас4ло
га2см
га3сто
га1сх
га4сь
га3сьв
га3тв
га3тра
гаў2г
га3хв
га3хл
га1чл
2г3б
г4бо
2г3в
г4ваз
гвас4
г4во
2гг3
2г3д
3г4е
ге2а3
ге3д
ге3м
ге4мн
ге1ра
гера4к3
2г3з
3гі
гіг3р
гі3ё2
гіёг3
гіра3
гія1
гі1ям
гі1ят
2г3к
гка3
гка4с
2гла.
2глай
4глам
2г3лас2
гла3т
4глаў
4глах
4глаю
4гле.
гле3е
2г3лі
4глік
3г4ліф
2гло
г3лос
3г4лот
4глу.
г4ль
2глю
3гляб
г3ляв
г3лям
г3ляп
г3лят
2г3м
гмаг3
гмо2
гмог3
2гн
3г4наі
г4нан
3гнана
гна2с
гнас3т
г4нев
гне2з
гнез3д
г3нёв
3г4нів
г4ніл
г4ніў
г4нію
3гное
г3ноза
г3нол
г3нос
г3ноў
г4ною
г3няб
г3няд
г3ням
г3нян
гня4сь
г3няць
г4о
го2д
го3ду
4гр.
4гра.
4г3рабс
г3раву
г3равы
г3раг
2град
г3рада
г3радк
г3радн
гра4зн
г3разо
г3раі
г1рак
г3раку
г3рало
2грам
г3рано
г3рап
г3рар
г3ра3с4
г3рат
4г3рах
2г3ров
4гроў
4грох
2г3ру.
2г3ры.
гры4зв
2г3рык
г3рын
г3рыс
г3рыц
2г3рыч
г3рэг
2г3рэс
4гс
гст3р
2г3т
г4у
гуг3н
3гуе
3гуй
3гук
гу3мо
3гун
гу4ст
3гую
2г3ц
г4цв
2г3ч
2г3ш
1ґ2
ґас3
4ґ3л
2ґ3м
ґ3н
1да
2дабе
да4бед
3дабен
да3бры
даб4рыс
4да4буе
4да4буй
4да4бул
4д3а4бут
4дабуў
4да4буц
4да4бую
4дабыч
2да3б'
3дават
2даг4
да3гн
да3гра
да4граю
д1а2гу
да3д4
2дадд
д3адзя
да4дні
даё4
да3ж4да
да3ж4не
да3жнё
да3жня
да3з2
даз4д
дазь4
3даі
да3к4в
да3кр
3дакра
3дакум
3далёк
3далік
4далім
3далу
да3ль4л
да3лья
4далюс
2дамн
дам4ні
да3м4ч
данст4
да3п4
да4пэр
да4раўш
да4раце
да4рацё
2да3р4б
2дар2в
да3р4ва
да3рве
да4ромс
да4руц
2д1арф
дар4фу
3дары
4да4рэ.
3дарэм
да4рэс
да4рэц
4да4рэш
да1с2
д3а4саб
да3св
2дасе
да4сен
4д3а4сін
2дасл
4д3асно
да4соб
да3с4п
дас4с
дас4т
3дасто
3дасьл
дась4н
4дасьп
дась4с
да4сьц
да3тв
даткаў4
4даткн
да3т4ле
2да3тр
да4тран
дат4ру
дат4ры
4датча
4датчо
дат4чыц
4датчэ
3датыч
3даўг
4даўе
4даўё
даў3з
да3ўла
даў2п
да3ўт
4даўю
4даўя
дах4в
3даход
даць4
да3цьв
3дашк
даш4кі
да3шко
даш4ку
да3ш4л
даш4н
да2шу
да3шш
даю4ча
даю4чу
дая4р
дб2
д3бл
д3бр
2дв
3д2ваі
д3вал
д3ван
д4варц
д2вое
д2воі
д2вой
3двойн
д4вор.
д4ворк
дву2х1
двы4кл
двы4сь
2д3г4
4д3д2
дда2с
дда3шн
ддзе3я
д2ж
2дж.
3джа
2джв
3джг
3джґ
2джл
2джм
3джон
2джр
2джт
3джу
д3жыв
д3жыт
1джэ
4джэ.
4джэш
1дз
2дза
4д1з2в
4дзек
3дзеп
3дзій
4дзімн
4дзімо
4дзк
2дзл
д1зн
2дзо
4дзт
2дзу
2дзь
4дзь.
4дзь3д
дзь4ме
2дзы
д4зэ
3дзю
2дзям
3дзям.
3дзямі
4д3к4
дка3к
дка3тв
2дл
д3ла
д3лё
д3лі
дліта4г
4длу.
д2луб
д3ля
2дм
дмас3т
д3мо
2дн
д4наван
днад2
дна3дв
дна4зн
днай4ме
дна3т
днаў4лю
дна1ч
дне1с
дне4сь
д3но
д4нуюч
3д2нюе
д2нюй
3д4нява
1до
3добр
3дов
3дог
до3гр
3дое
2доз
до3зв
3док
3дом
3дон
до1сь
3дот
3доў
доў3жы
3дох
до3х2р
дош3л
2д3п4
дпа4сь3
дпа4хв
дпа4ш
д1р
4дра.
д2раб
3драбн
д3рабо
д3рабр
3драбя
4д3рав
д2рае
3драен
1д2раж3
дра3з4б
д2раі
д2рай
2дра3к4
дра4кл
д4рамал
д4рамаў
д4раміц
дра4мн
4д3рані
д4ранц
д2рап
2драс
д2раў
дра4хр
2д3рач
2д3раш
д3ров
2д3род
4дрок
д2ром
2д3рос
д2ру
4д3ру.
д3руб
3д4руж
3друз
д3руй
1друк
д3рум
д3рус
д3руч
д3ры.
д4рыгв
дрыг3н
1д2рыж
д4рынк
2д3рыў
дрыя3
дрэ3а
2д2рэв
2д2рэй
д3рэйс
3дрэйф
3д2рэм
1д2рэс
3д2рэў
2дрэш
2д3с4
дсь2
4д3т2
1ду
2дубо
2д1у4г4
д4уго
3дуе
2д1уз
3дуй
2ду4ла
д4ула.
ду3мо
3дун
2д1у4п
3дур
ду4сю
2дух
3ду3ха
д1у2хі
3дую
д3ф2
2д3х4
2д3ц4
2д1ч
д3чэ
2д3ш2
д4шн
1ды
3ды.
3дыв
дыг3р
ды2ё
дыё3г
ды4зас
3дык
2дымп
дым3ч
2дынд
д3ынду
3дыні
д3ынст
2дынт
2дынф
3дынь
3дыня
дып3
3дыр
3дыск
дыс3кв
дыст3р
дысь3
дыф3т
3дыша
ды4шл
ды2яр
дыяс3т
1дэ
дэ4ар
дэ3б2
дэ3г4
дэд4
3дэ4з
дэк4в
2дэкз
дэ4сь
2дэц
д'3
2е1а2
еа4б
е2аг
еа3гр
еадаб3
е2аз
еа3зо
е2а3л
е2а3м
еап4
еапе3
еа4с
е2а3т
е2аф
е2ац
еа4ш
еаш3ч
еба4кр
еба4п3р
ебас4
еба2я
еб1ра
евас3т
ева3ф
евяціс4
2ег
ег4в
е2г3л
е3г4ле
ег4ля
ег3н
е3гр
е4грэ
е2д
еда3ж
е3да4з
едаз3в
еда4кра
е3дапы
е3даск
еда4сто
еда4сьл
еда3т
е3дзі
е4дзь3
е3дзя
е3до
2ед2р
ед3ро
е3ды
е3дэ
е1е
е2ев
ее1ра
е1жа
ежа1с
ежась4
еж2д
е1жу
2еза
еза4г
ез1ад
езапом4
ез3б
е1зе
ез3ж
е1зі
ез2м
ез3ры
е2зу
ез1ув
ез1ул
езь3
е2з2ы
е3зя
е1і
еі2д
еідэ3а
еі2лю
еі2м
е2к
2е3ка
е3кі
ек3л
ек4лу
ек4ля
е3кр
е3ку
ела3б2
ела3ст
ела3т
ела3х
ела3ш
ел3г
ель3д
ель3л
е3ля
еля4гр
е2м
ема3т
е3ме
е3мі
емле3
емнага4
е3мо
ем3р
е4мс
е3му
е4мш
е3мы
е3мя
емя3ў
е2н
ена3г
2енак
ена4т3р
е3но
ен3сп
ен1шт
е3ню
е3ня
еняць3
е1он
е1оп
е3ор
2еп
еп3л
епла3
еплас4
е4п3ру
ера3г4н
ера4даб
е3радб
е3радв
ера3дз
е3радм
ера3ж4д
ера3ж4н
ера3за
ера3з4д
еразь4н
ераль4л
ера3п4
ера1с2
ера3ск
ерас4л
ера3с4н
ерас4с
ера3т2
ера4ткі
ера4тц
е3раў.
ераў3т
ера3ф
ера3х
е3рачн
ера3ш
ерая4
ерда3
еро2г3
ерсь3
е1ру
е1ры
2еса
еса3к
еса3п
есапе3
е4сау
е1с2в
е3скап
е4скі
е3ско
е4ску
ес3лаў
ес2п
ес3пл
ес3пр
ессань4
е4стай
е4стаў
е4стах
е4стаю
2есу
ес4ф
ес2цэ
есь3ві
е2сьл
е1сьм
е4сьн
есь3п
е4сьці.
ета3п
ет3к
е4тл
е1то
ет1р
етра3с
етра3ў
ет4рым
е1ту
етэа4
е1у
2еўб
е3ў2ві
еў3д
еў3ж
еўз3ар
еўз3в
еўз3г
еўзь3
еў4каз
е3ўкр
е1ўл
2еў3п
еў3р
еў3сь
е3ўтв
е1х
еха3тв
е3хл
ех4т
е3це
е3цьв
2еця
2еча
еш3л
еш4ля
еш4т
е1э4
е1я
е2яв
ея4д
еяе4
е2я1з
е4янё
е3я2п
е2яс4
е2яш
е4яю
ё1а4
ёаст1
ё2б
ё3бу
ёва3ў
2ёг
ё1д
ёд4нё
ёд4ні.
ёд4ню
ёд2ня
ё2др
ёды3яп
ё3жа
ё3з2в
ёз3д
ё1зе
4ёзно
ё1і
ёка3п
ёка3ст
ёкась4
ёк3в
ёк3ла
ё2кп
2ёл
ё4ль
3ёлю
ё2м
ё3ма
ё4мап
ё3міл
ё3міў
